Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.040

Legislative systems coordinator—Employment, duties.

Subject to RCW 44.04.260:

(1) The administrative committee shall employ a legislative systems coordinator. The coordinator shall serve at the pleasure of the administrative committee, which shall fix the coordinator's salary.

(2)(a) The coordinator shall serve as the executive and administrative head of the center, and shall assist the administrative committee in managing the information processing and communications systems of the legislature as directed by the administrative committee;

(b) In accordance with an adopted personnel plan, the coordinator shall employ or engage and fix the compensation for personnel required to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(c) The coordinator shall enter into contracts for: (i) The sale, exchange, or acquisition of equipment, supplies, services, and facilities required to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and (ii) the distribution of legislative information.

[ 2020 c 114 s 10; 2007 c 18 s 3; 2001 c 259 s 17; 1986 c 61 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.